Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.195

Costs of implementing RCW 16.67.091.

The costs incurred by the department associated with the implementation of RCW 16.67.091 shall be paid for by the commission.

[ 2003 c 396 s 36.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.